Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2274.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3362(a) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:SECTION 1. SECTION 3362(B)(1) OF TITLE 75 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES IS AMENDED AND SUBSECTION (A) IS AMENDED BY ADDING A PARAGRAPH TO READ:§ 3362. Maximum speed limits.(a) General rule.--Except when a special hazard exists that requires lower speed for compliance with section 3361 (relating to driving vehicle at safe speed), the limits specified in this section or established under this subchapter shall be maximum lawful speeds and no person shall drive a vehicle at a speed in excess of the following maximum limits:* * *<--<--123456789101112131415161718 (1.3) 35 miles per hour on a dirt and gravel road.* * *(B) POSTING OF SPEED LIMIT.--(1) NO MAXIMUM SPEED LIMIT ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1), (1.2), (1.3) OR (3) SHALL BE EFFECTIVE UNLESS POSTED ON FIXED OR VARIABLE OFFICIAL TRAFFIC-CONTROL DEVICES ERECTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE DEPARTMENT WHICH REGULATIONS SHALL REQUIRE POSTING AT THE BEGINNING AND END OF EACH SPEED ZONE AND AT INTERVALS NOT GREATER THAN ONE-HALF MILE.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2274PN3179 - 2 - <--123456789101112